California, session 20252026, SB307.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66093.2 is added to the Education Code, to read:66093.2. (a) For purposes of this section, “institution” means a California State University or a University of California campus.(b) The Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, in addition to complying with subdivision (j) of Section 66093.3, do all of the following:(1) If an undocumented student is subject to immigration enforcement activity, ensure that the undocumented student’s inability to satisfy the student’s academic requirements at the institution due to immigration enforcement activity does not affect the student’s qualification for the exemption from paying nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5, provided the student meets the requirements described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 68130.5.(2) Ensure that staff and the designated Dreamer Resource Liaison at the institution assist undocumented students in accessing all financial aid and academic resources available to undocumented students.(3) Adopt a systemwide policy addressing course grades, administrative withdrawal, and reenrollment for undocumented students who are unable to attend their courses by the final drop date due to immigration enforcement activity. The systemwide policy shall include a timeframe during which a student withdrawn for nonattendance is reenrolled and retains the same academic status they held before their withdrawal, upon submitting written confirmation of their intent to return to the institution.